Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB556.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workplace
Standards under the direction and supervision of the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(b) "Department" means the Department of Workplace Standards in the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(c) 1. "Wages" includes any compensation due to an employee by reason of
his or her employment, including salaries, commissions, vested vacation
pay, overtime pay, severance or dismissal pay, earned bonuses, and any
other similar advantages agreed upon by the employer and the employee
or provided to employees as an established policy. The wages shall be
payable in legal tender of the United States, checks on banks, direct
deposits, or payroll card accounts convertible into cash on demand at
full face value, subject to the allowances made in this chapter. However,
an employee may not be charged an activation fee and the payroll card
account shall provide the employee with the ability, without charge, to
make at least one (1) withdrawal per pay period for any amount up to
and including the full account balance.
2. For the purposes of calculating hourly wage rates for scheduled
overtime for professional firefighters, as defined in KRS 95A.210(8),
"wages" shall not include the distribution to qualified professional
firefighters by local governments of supplements received from the
Firefighters Foundation Program Fund. For the purposes of calculating
hourly wage rates for unscheduled overtime for professional firefighters,
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
as defined in KRS 95A.210(9), "wages" shall include the distribution to
qualified professional firefighters by local governments of supplements
received from the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund;
(d) "Employer" is any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency,
or firm who employs an employee and includes any person, either individual,
corporation, partnership, agency, or firm acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of an employer in relation to an employee; and
(e) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, except that:
1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee
nor a franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisor for any purpose under this chapter; and
2. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor
nor a franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisee for any purpose under this chapter.
For purposes of this paragraph, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1.
(2) As used in KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, and 337.385 to 337.405, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(a) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, but shall not include:
1. Any individual employed in agriculture;
2. Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative,
supervisory, or professional capacity, or in the capacity of outside
salesman, or as an outside collector as the terms are defined by
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
administrative regulations of the commissioner;
3. Any individual employed by the United States;
4. Any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private
home. The provisions of this section shall include individuals employed
in domestic service in or about the home of an employer where there is
more than one (1) domestic servant regularly employed;
5. Any individual classified and given a certificate by the commissioner
showing a status of learner, apprentice, worker with a disability,
sheltered workshop employee, and student under administrative
procedures and administrative regulations prescribed and promulgated
by the commissioner. This certificate shall authorize employment at the
wages, less than the established fixed minimum fair wage rates, and for
the period of time fixed by the commissioner and stated in the certificate
issued to the person;
6. Employees of retail stores, service industries, hotels, motels, and
restaurant operations whose average annual gross volume of sales made
for business done is less than ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) for
the five (5) preceding years exclusive of excise taxes at the retail level
or if the employee is the parent, spouse, child, or other member of his or
her employer's immediate family;
7. Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in an employer's home, or an
individual employed as a companion by a sick, convalescing, or elderly
person or by the person's immediate family, to care for that sick,
convalescing, or elderly person and whose principal duties do not
include housekeeping;
8. Any individual engaged in the delivery of newspapers to the consumer;
9. Any individual subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 7, 16, 27A,
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
30A, and 18A provided that the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall
have the authority to prescribe by administrative regulation those
emergency employees, or others, who shall receive overtime pay rates
necessary for the efficient operation of government and the protection of
affected employees;
10. Any employee employed by an establishment which is an organized
nonprofit camp, religious, or nonprofit educational conference center, if
it does not operate for more than two hundred ten (210) days in any
calendar year;
11. Any employee whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care on the employer's premises in a parental role to children
who are primarily dependent, neglected, and abused and who are in the
care of private, nonprofit childcaring facilities licensed by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services under KRS 199.640 to 199.670;
12. Any individual whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care in his or her own home as a family caregiver, family
home provider, or adult foster care provider and who is approved to
provide family caregiver services to an adult with a disability through a
contractual relationship with a community board for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability established under KRS
210.370 to 210.460 or through a contractual relationship with a certified
waiver provider as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), or is certified or
licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide adult
foster care;
13. A direct seller as defined in Section 3508(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986;
14. Any individual whose function is to provide behavior support services,
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
behavior programming services, case management services, community
living support services, positive behavior support services, or respite
services through a contractual relationship with a certified waiver
provider, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), pursuant to a 1915(c)
home and community based services waiver program, as defined in 907
KAR 7:005 sec. 1(2); or
15. Any individual employed to play baseball who is compensated pursuant
to the terms of a contract and a collective bargaining agreement that
expressly provides for wages and working conditions;
(b) "Agriculture" means farming in all its branches, including cultivation and
tillage of the soil; dairying; production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting
of any agricultural or horticultural commodity; raising of livestock, bees,
furbearing animals, or poultry; and any practice, including any forestry or
lumbering operations, performed on a farm in conjunction with farming
operations, including preparation and delivery of produce to storage, to
market, or to carriers for transportation to market;
(c) "Gratuity" means voluntary monetary contribution received by an employee
from a guest, patron, or customer for services rendered;
(d) "Tipped employee" means any employee engaged in an occupation in which
he or she customarily and regularly receives more than thirty dollars ($30) per
month in tips; and
(e) "U.S.C." means the United States Code.
(3) As used in this subsection and Section 2 of this Act, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(a) "Committed relationship" means a relationship between individuals who
are currently engaged in a relationship of a romantic or intimate nature,
and does not include a casual acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
in a business or social context. The following factors may be considered in
addition to any other relevant factors in determining whether the
relationship is of a romantic or intimate nature:
1. Declarations of romantic interest;
2. The relationship is characterized by the expectation of affection;
3. Attendance at social outings together as a couple;
4. The frequency and type of interaction between the persons, including
whether the persons have been involved together over time and on a
continuous basis;
5. The length of the relationship; and
6. Other indications of a substantial connection that would lead a
reasonable person to understand that a committed relationship exists;
(b) "Family care leave" means unpaid leave to care for a child or family
member of the employee;
(c) "Family member" means a:
1. Person to whom the employee is related by blood, legal custody, or
marriage;
2. Child who lives with an employee for whom the employee permanently
assumes and discharges parental responsibility;
3. Person with whom the employee shares, or has shared within the last
year, a mutual residence and with whom the employee maintains a
committed relationship; or
4. Foster child;
(d) "Health care provider" means any person licensed under federal or state
law to provide health care services;
(e) "Same employer" means an office, division, subdivision, or other
organizational section of an employer in which both employees have the
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
same or interrelated duties and the absence of both employees would unduly
disrupt the conduct of the employer's business; and
(f) "Serious health condition" means an illness, injury, impairment, or
physical or mental condition that involves either:
1. Inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health care facility;
or
2. Continuing treatment or supervision by a health care provider or other
competent individual.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) It shall be an unlawful employment practice for any employer to refuse to grant
family care leave of up to twelve (12) work weeks in any twelve (12) month period
by an employee if the employee has more than twelve (12) months of service and
at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours of service with that
employer during the previous twelve (12) month period. Family care leave
requested pursuant to this section shall be deemed to have been granted by the
employer only if it includes a guarantee of employment for the employee in the
same or a comparable position upon the termination of the leave.
(2) An employee shall be entitled to family care leave described in subsection (1) of
this section for the:
(a) Birth, adoption, or foster care placement of a child to the employee or to a
family member and for whom the employee assumes and discharges
parental responsibility; or
(b) Care of a family member who has a serious health condition.
(3) The entitlement to family care leave under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
expire twelve (12) months after the birth, adoption, or foster care placement of
the child.
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
(4) In the case of a family member who has a serious health condition, family care
leave may be taken intermittently when medically necessary as determined by the
family member's health care provider.
(5) Upon agreement between the employer and the employee, family care leave may
be taken on a reduced leave schedule, during which the twelve (12) work weeks of
family care leave may be taken over a period not to exceed twenty-four (24)
consecutive work weeks.
(6) This section shall not be construed to require an employer to provide paid family
care leave, but an employer may permit an employee to use paid leave in the
following circumstances:
(a) Any paid family, vacation, personal, or compensatory leave provided by an
employer that the employee elects to use for family care leave shall count
against the twelve (12) work weeks of allowable family care leave; and
(b) If an employer has a program that allows an employee to use paid leave of
another employee under certain conditions, and the conditions have been
met, the employee may use the paid leave as family care leave and the leave
shall count against the twelve (12) work weeks of family care leave.
(7) If two (2) family members are employees of the same employer, the employer
may limit to:
(a) Twelve (12) work weeks during a twenty-four (24) month period the
aggregate number of family care leave work weeks to which the family
members are entitled; and
(b) Four (4) work weeks during a twenty-four (24) month period the aggregate
number of family care leave work weeks to which the family members are
entitled to take simultaneously.
(8) If the necessity for leave under this section is foreseeable based on the birth of a
child to, adoption of a child by, or foster care placement of a child with an
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
employee, the employee shall provide the employer with reasonable prior notice of
the expected birth, adoption, or foster care placement of a child with the
employee.
(9) If the necessity for leave under this section is foreseeable based on planned
medical treatment or care, an employee shall:
(a) Provide the employer with reasonable prior notice; and
(b) Make a reasonable effort to schedule the care in a manner that does not
unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.
(10) Information that an employee gives to an employer regarding a family member's
medical record and a family relationship, pursuant to which the employee seeks
to take family care leave under this section, shall be used only to make a decision
in regard to the provisions of this chapter. An employer shall keep information
regarding the family member's medical record and family relationship
confidential.
(11) (a) In the event that family care leave is being requested to care for a family
member under subsection (2)(b) of this section, an employer may require
that the request be supported by a certification issued by the health care
provider of the family member. The employee shall provide a copy of the
certification to the employer.
(b) The certification provided by the employee to the employer shall state:
1. The date on which the serious health condition commenced;
2. The probable duration of the condition; and
3. An estimate of the amount of time that the employee is needed to care
for the family member.
(12) A person shall not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of or any attempt
to exercise any right provided by this section.
(13) An employer shall not retaliate or otherwise discriminate against an employee
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
enforcing his or her rights under this section.
Section 3. KRS 337.990 is amended to read as follows:
The following civil penalties shall be imposed by the Education and Labor Cabinet, in
accordance with the provisions in KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this
chapter:
(1) Any firm, individual, partnership, or corporation that violates KRS 337.020 shall be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. Each failure to pay an employee the
wages when due him under KRS 337.020 shall constitute a separate offense.
(2) Any employer who violates KRS 337.050 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(3) Any employer who violates KRS 337.055 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
for each offense and shall make full payment to the employee by reason of the
violation. Each failure to pay an employee the wages as required by KRS 337.055
shall constitute a separate offense.
(4) Any employer who violates KRS 337.060 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
and shall also be liable to the affected employee for the amount withheld, plus
interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum.
(5) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 337.065 shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each offense and shall make full payment to the employee by
reason of the violation.
(6) Any person who fails to comply with KRS 337.070 shall be assessed a civil penalty
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) for each offense and each day that the failure continues shall be deemed a
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
separate offense.
(7) Any employer who violates any provision of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, KRS
337.345, and KRS 337.385 to 337.405, or willfully hinders or delays the
commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative in the performance
of his or her duties under KRS 337.295, or fails to keep and preserve any records as
required under KRS 337.320 and 337.325, or falsifies any record, or refuses to
make any record or transcription thereof accessible to the commissioner or the
commissioner's authorized representative shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
A civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be assessed for
any subsequent violation of KRS 337.285(4) to (9) and each day the employer
violates KRS 337.285(4) to (9) shall constitute a separate offense and penalty.
(8) Any employer who pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the rate
applicable under KRS 337.275 and 337.285, or any wage order issued pursuant
thereto shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100)
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(9) Any employer who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any
employee because the employee has made any complaint to his or her employer, to
the commissioner, or to the commissioner's authorized representative that he or she
has not been paid wages in accordance with KRS 337.275 and 337.285 or
regulations issued thereunder, or because the employee has caused to be instituted
or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to KRS
337.385, or because the employee has testified or is about to testify in any such
proceeding, shall be deemed in violation of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, KRS 337.345,
and KRS 337.385 to 337.405 and shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than
one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(10) Any employer who violates KRS 337.365 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 297
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(11) A person shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars
($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) when that person discharges or
in any other manner discriminates against an employee because the employee has:
(a) Made any complaint to his or her employer, the commissioner, or any other
person; or
(b) Instituted, or caused to be instituted, any proceeding under or related to KRS
337.420 to 337.433; or
(c) Testified, or is about to testify, in any such proceedings.
(12) Any person who violates Section 2 of this Act shall be assessed a civil penalty of
not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000).
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 1/7/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed